voikko-fi/vvfst/lukusanat.lexc
! Voikko-fi, suomen kielen muoto-opin kuvaus.
!
! Tekijänoikeus © 2006 - 2015 Hannu Väisänen (Etunimi.Sukunimi@joensuu.fi)
!                 2006 - 2015 Harri Pitkänen (hatapitk@iki.fi)
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
! it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation; either version 2, or (at your option)
! any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
! WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
! General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
! along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write to the
! Free Software Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
! 02110-1301, USA.

LEXICON LukusananAlku
Lukusana	;
Järjestysluku	;
Erikoisluku	;
NumeromerkinAlku	;
@D.YS_ALKANUT@:@D.YS_ALKANUT@	RoomalainenNumero	;

LEXICON LukusananAlkuKerroin
LukusanaSgNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSpNy29Alut	;
LukusanaStrNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSesNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSineNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSelaNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSillNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSadeNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSablNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSallNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSabNy29Alut	;
LukusanaSgNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSpNm29Alut	;
LukusanaStrNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSesNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSineNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSelaNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSillNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSadeNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSablNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSallNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSabNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSinNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSkoNm29Alut	;
LukusanaSstiNy29Alut	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kymmenen[X]kymmenen@U.LS.SNNY@:kymmenen@U.LS.SNNY@	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]kymmenen[X]kymmenet@U.LS.SNNM@:kymmenet@U.LS.SNNM@	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sata[X]sata@U.LS.SNNY@:sata@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaSnNy29_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sata[X]sata@U.LS.SNNY@:sata@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaYksiYhdeksän	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]sata[X]sadat@U.LS.SNNM@:sadat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]tuhat[X]tuhat@U.LS.SNNY@:tuhat@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]tuhat[X]tuhannet@U.LS.SNNM@:tuhannet@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljoona[X]miljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:miljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]miljoona[X]miljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:miljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljardi[X]miljardi@U.LS.SNNY@:miljardi@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]miljardi[X]miljardit@U.LS.SNNM@:miljardit@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]biljoona[X]biljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:biljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]biljoona[X]biljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:biljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]triljoona[X]triljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:triljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]triljoona[X]triljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:triljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvadriljoona[X]kvadriljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:kvadriljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvadriljoona[X]kvadriljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:kvadriljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvintiljoona[X]kvintiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:kvintiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvintiljoona[X]kvintiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:kvintiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sekstiljoona[X]sekstiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:sekstiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sekstiljoona[X]sekstiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:sekstiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]septiljoona[X]septiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:septiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]septiljoona[X]septiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:septiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sentiljoona[X]sentiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:sentiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sentiljoona[X]sentiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:sentiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;

LEXICON LukusananJatkoKerroin
LukusanaSgNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSpNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaStrNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSesNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSineNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSelaNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSillNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSadeNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSablNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSallNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSabNy29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSgNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSpNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaStrNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSesNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSineNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSelaNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSillNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSadeNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSablNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSallNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSabNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSinNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSkoNm29Kertoimet	;
LukusanaSstiNy29Kertoimet	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kymmentä[X]kymmenen@U.LS.SNNY@:kymmenen@U.LS.SNNY@	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]kymmentä[X]kymmenet@U.LS.SNNM@:kymmenet@U.LS.SNNM@	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sataa[X]sata@U.LS.SNNY@:sata@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaSnNy29_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sataa[X]sata@U.LS.SNNY@:sata@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaYksiYhdeksän	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]sataa[X]sadat@U.LS.SNNM@:sadat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]tuhatta[X]tuhat@U.LS.SNNY@:tuhat@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]tuhatta[X]tuhannet@U.LS.SNNM@:tuhannet@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljoonaa[X]miljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:miljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]miljoonaa[X]miljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:miljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljardia[X]miljardi@U.LS.SNNY@:miljardi@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]miljardia[X]miljardit@U.LS.SNNM@:miljardit@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]biljoonaa[X]biljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:biljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]biljoonaa[X]biljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:biljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]triljoonaa[X]triljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:triljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]triljoonaa[X]triljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:triljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvadriljoonaa[X]kvadriljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:kvadriljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvadriljoonaa[X]kvadriljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:kvadriljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvintiljoonaa[X]kvintiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:kvintiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kvintiljoonaa[X]kvintiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:kvintiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sekstiljoonaa[X]sekstiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:sekstiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sekstiljoonaa[X]sekstiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:sekstiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]septiljoonaa[X]septiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:septiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]septiljoonaa[X]septiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:septiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sentiljoonaa[X]sentiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@:sentiljoona@U.LS.SNNY@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sentiljoonaa[X]sentiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@:sentiljoonat@U.LS.SNNM@	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;

LEXICON Lukusana
LukusanaYksiYhdeksän	;
[Lu]:	LukusananAlkuKerroin	;

LEXICON LukusanaYksiYhdeksän
[Lu][Xp]yksi[X]y:y	LukusanaYksi_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kaksi[X]ka:ka	LukusanaKaksi_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kolme[X]kolm:kolm	LukusanaKolme_a	;
[Lu][Xp]neljä[X]nelj:nelj	LukusanaNeljä_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]viisi[X]vii:vii	LukusanaViisi_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kuusi[X]kuu:kuu	LukusanaViisi_a	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemän[X]seitsem:seitsem	LukusanaSeitsemän_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksan[X]kahdeks:kahdeks	LukusanaSeitsemän_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksän[X]yhdeks:yhdeks	LukusanaSeitsemän_ä	;

LEXICON JärjestysluvunAlkuKerroin
JärjestyslukuSgNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSpNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuStrNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSesNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSineNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSelaNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSillNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSadeNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSablNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSallNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSabNy39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSgNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSpNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuStrNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSesNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSineNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSelaNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSillNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSadeNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSablNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSallNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSabNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSinNm39Kertoimet	;
JärjestyslukuSkoNm39Kertoimet	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]kymmenes[X]kymmenes@U.LS.SNNY@:kymmenes@U.LS.SNNY@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_ä	;
[Sn][Nm][Xp]kymmenes[X]kymmenennet@U.LS.SNNM@:kymmenennet@U.LS.SNNM@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_ä	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]sadas[X]sadas@U.LS.SNNY@:sadas@U.LS.SNNY@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]tuhannes[X]tuhannes@U.LS.SNNY@:tuhannes@U.LS.SNNY@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljoonas[X]miljoonas@U.LS.SNNY@:miljoonas@U.LS.SNNY@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Xp]miljardis[X]miljardis@U.LS.SNNY@:miljardis@U.LS.SNNY@	JärjestyslukuLiitesanaJl_a	;

LEXICON Järjestysluku
[Lu][Xp]ensimmäinen[X]ensimmäi:ensimmäi	JärjestyslukuNainen_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdes[X]yhde:yhde	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]toinen[X]toi:toi	JärjestyslukuNainen_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdes[X]kahde:kahde	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kolmas[X]kolma:kolma	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_a	;
[Lu][Xp]neljäs[X]neljä:neljä	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]viides[X]viide:viide	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kuudes[X]kuude:kuude	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_a	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemäs[X]seitsemä:seitsemä	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksas[X]kahdeksa:kahdeksa	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksäs[X]yhdeksä:yhdeksä	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu]:	JärjestysluvunAlkuKerroin	;
